Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-674
Acquisition of plants or facilities; condemnation; procedure.

The mayor and city council of a city of the first class shall have power to purchase or provide for, establish, construct, extend, enlarge, maintain, operate, and regulate for the city any such waterworks, gas works, power plant, including an electrical distribution facility, electric or other light works, or heating plant, or to condemn and appropriate, for the use of the city, waterworks, gas works, power plant, including an electrical distribution facility, electric or other light works, or heating plant. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724, except as to property specifically excluded by section 76-703 and as to which sections 19-701 to 19-707 or the Municipal Natural Gas System Condemnation Act is applicable. For purposes of this section, an electrical distribution facility shall be located within the retail service area of such city as approved by and on file with the Nebraska Power Review Board, pursuant to Chapter 70, article 10.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 54, p. 272;

Laws 1905, c. 23, § 2, p. 244;

Laws 1907, c. 14, § 1, p. 122;

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 184;

R.S.1913, § 4954;

Laws 1917, c. 97, § 1, p. 260;

Laws 1919, c. 38, § 1, p. 120;

Laws 1921, c. 169, § 1, p. 661;

C.S.1922, § 4123;

C.S.1929, § 16-652;

Laws 1931, c. 29, § 1, p. 118;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-652;

R.S.1943, § 16-674;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 53, p. 471;

Laws 1982, LB 875, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 24;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 65.

Municipal Natural Gas System Condemnation Act, see section 19-4624.

Gas company's franchise authorizes it to substitute natural gas for artificial gas, as such substitution carries out the intention of the franchise to insure the best gas available to the users. Central Power Co. v. City of Hastings, 52 F.2d 487 (D. Neb. 1931).